Washington statutes.
RCW 44.48.060

Officers and rules.

The committee shall have the power and duty to appoint its own chair, vice chair, and other officers; and to make rules for orderly procedure.

[ 2009 c 549 s 6018; 1977 ex.s. c 373 s 6.]